Maryland, session 2026, HB0178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
18–510.
(A) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH THREE SPECIALIZED
CLINICS DEDICATED TO THE MANAGEMENT AND TREATMENT OF SICKLE CELL
DISEASE.
(2) THE CLINICS ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE LOCATED IN:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0178*

HOUSE BILL 178
(I) MONTGOMERY COUNTY;
(II) HARFORD COUNTY; AND
(III) A COUNTY LOCATED ON THE EASTERN SHORE.
(B) EACH CLINIC ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL:
(1) OPERATE UNDER A HUB–AND–SPOKE MODEL WITH A
SPECIALIZED SICKLE CELL DISEASE CARE HUB;
(2) PROVIDE ROUTINE CARE, PAIN MANAGEMENT, GENETIC
COUNSELING, MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES, SURVEILLANCE, AND PATIENT
EDUCATION; AND
(3) IN COLLABORATION WITH THE SPECIALIZED SICKLE CELL
DISEASE CARE HUB:
(I) ENSURE CONSISTENT ACCESS TO HUB–BASED SICKLE CELL
DISEASE SPECIALISTS THROUGH TELEHEALTH OR ON–SITE VISITS TO MANAGE
COMPLEX PATIENT NEEDS;
(II) OFFER COMPREHENSIVE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH AND
SOCIAL SUPPORT SERVICES TO ADDRESS THE MULTIFACETED CHALLENGES FACED
BY INDIVIDUALS WITH SICKLE CELL DISEASE;
(III) OPERATE OR COORDINATE INFUSION THERAPY AND
STRUCTURED PAIN MANAGEMENT PROGRAMS TAILORED TO THE CLINICAL
DEMANDS OF SICKLE CELL DISEASE PATIENTS;
(IV) COLLABORATE WITH LOCAL PRIMARY CARE PROVIDERS
AND SOCIAL SERVICES AGENCIES TO STREAMLINE REFERRALS, REDUCE CARE GAPS,
AND ADDRESS SOCIAL DETERMINANTS OF HEALTH WITHIN THE COMMUNITY; AND
(V) PARTNER WITH A SICKLE CELL DISEASE–FOCUSED,
COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATION LOCATED IN THE STATE TO IDENTIFY AND
ADDRESS SOCIAL BARRIERS, INCLUDING ASSISTANCE WITH TRANSPORTATION,
HOUSING, NUTRITION, AND OTHER ESSENTIAL SUPPORTS.
(C) (1) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $6,138,000 TO SUPPORT CLINIC
OPERATIONS, STAFFING, TRAINING, AND SOCIAL SUPPORT SERVICES.

HOUSE BILL 178 3
(2) A PORTION OF THE FUNDING PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE ALLOCATED TO COMMUNITY–BASED
ORGANIZATIONS AND SICKLE CELL DISEASE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS LOCATED
IN THE STATE TO:
(I) ENHANCE PATIENT OUTREACH;
(II) PROVIDE EDUCATION;
(III) EXPAND SUPPORT SERVICES;
(IV) STRENGTHEN COMMUNITY PARTNERSHIPS; AND
(V) IMPROVE THE OVERALL CONTINUUM OF CARE FOR
INDIVIDUALS LIVING WITH SICKLE CELL DISEASE WITH AN EMPHASIS ON
SUPPORTING THE TRANSITION FROM PEDIATRIC TO ADULT CARE.
(3) THE FUNDING PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE PRIORITIZED FOR:
(I) THE HIRING OF QUALIFIED HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONALS,
INCLUDING HEMATOLOGISTS, NURSE PRACTITIONERS, NURSE NAVIGATORS, AND
COMMUNITY HEALTH CARE WORKERS;
(II) ADDRESSING SOCIAL DETERMINANTS OF HEALTH
AFFECTING INDIVIDUALS WITH SICKLE CELL DISEASE; AND
(III) COLLABORATING WITH COMMUNITY–BASED
ORGANIZATIONS AND SICKLE CELL DISEASE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS LOCATED
IN THE STATE.
(D) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE CLINICS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL ADDRESS, FOR EACH CLINIC:
(I) CLINIC OPERATIONS;
(II) OUTCOMES FOR PATIENTS TREATED AT THE CLINIC;

HOUSE BILL 178
(III) THE OVERALL IMPACT OF EACH CLINIC IN REDUCING
HEALTH DISPARITIES IN INDIVIDUALS WITH SICKLE CELL DISEASE;
(IV) UTILIZATION RATES, PATIENT VOLUME, AND
ACCESSIBILITY, INCLUDING IMPACTS OF HOURS OF OPERATIONS AND GEOGRAPHIC
REACH; AND
(V) IMPLEMENTATION OF TELEMEDICINE AND DIGITAL
HEALTH TOOLS TO EXPAND AND EXTEND CARE TO UNDERSERVED AREAS.
18–511.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM FOR
MEDICAL RESIDENTS WHO CHOOSE TO SPECIALIZE IN CLASSICAL HEMATOLOGY
WITH A FOCUS ON SICKLE CELL DISEASE CARE.
(B) THE SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE TO THE MEDICAL RESIDENT
IN EXCHANGE FOR THE RECIPIENT’S COMMITMENT TO PRACTICE IN THE STATE FOR
A MINIMUM PERIOD OF TIME, AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT, FOLLOWING
THE RECIPIENT’S RESIDENCY OR FELLOWSHIP.
(C) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL USE FEDERAL
FUNDING TO SUPPORT THE SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.